North Dakota, session 69, HB1133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-11-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
15.1-11-05. Preservation of records.
The county superintendent of schools shall provide for the preservation of all property that isrecords
acquired in an official capacity and which hashave educational value and interest or which
recordsrecord official acts by the county superintendent. At the conclusion of the county
superintendent's employment, the county superintendent shall deliver the propertyrecords to the
superintendent's successor.

H. B. NO. 1133 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1133.
House Vote: Yeas 85 Nays 3 Absent 6
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State